Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.075

Caseload estimate.

The caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload of the Washington college bound scholarship program and shall submit this forecast as specified in RCW 43.88C.020.

[ 2011 c 304 s 1.]